Georgia statutes. 
(2) For making his returns to the grand jury, $1.00.

(3) For making his returns to the judge of the probate court, $1.00.

However, in no case shall the compensation of a county treasurer exceed the sum of $3,000.00 per annum, unless within the sole discretion of the proper governing authority of the county the compensation is increased to a sum not to exceed $3,600.00 per annum.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 3627; Code 1868, § 3652; Code 1873, § 3703; Ga. L. 1874, p. 20, § 1; Code 1882, § 3703; Ga. L. 1890-91, p. 76, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 472; Civil Code 1910, § 588; Code 1933, § 23-1013; Ga. L. 1953, Nov.-Dec. Sess., p. 176, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Compensation of county officers generally, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. I, Para. III.

Authority of General Assembly to fix compensation of county treasurers, § 36-6-1.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

How commissions to be computed. - Commissions allowed to county treasurers under former Civil Code 1895, § 472 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-12) are to be computed upon their annual receipts and disbursements and not semiannual returns as provided by Ga. L. 1876, p. 13, §§ 1-3 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-1-7). Burks v. Commissioners of Dougherty County, 99 Ga. 181, 25 S.E. 270 (1896).

Law providing compensation for county treasurers is found in this section, and by reference to that it will be observed that the county treasurer receives compensation only for paying out "county funds" and for certain other services. McFarlin v. Board of Drainage Comm'rs, 153 Ga. 766, 113 S.E. 447 (1922).

Moneys received from sale of bonds lawfully issued by county for erection of a courthouse are "county funds" within the meaning of this section. Chattooga County v. Megginson, 139 Ga. 509, 77 S.E. 579 (1913).

Moneys received from temporary loan or loans to supply casual deficiencies of revenue, lawfully made, are "county funds" within the meaning of this section. Williams v. Sumter County, 21 Ga. App. 716, 94 S.E. 913 (1918).

No right to commission for disbursing money illegally borrowed. - When a county treasurer receives from the county authorities, by virtue of the treasurer's office, money which has been illegally borrowed by the authorities, and disburses the money for current expenses of the county, and the illegal loans are repaid from money coming from taxes or other legitimate sources, the treasurer is not entitled to commissions for handling the illegally borrowed money, to be paid out of county funds proper. Roberts v. Dancer, 144 Ga. 341, 87 S.E. 287 (1915); Williams v. Sumter County, 21 Ga. App. 716, 94 S.E. 913 (1918).

Paying accrued interest. - Treasurer, for making a disbursement of county funds in paying accrued interest on bonds, is entitled to commissions. Chattooga County v. Megginson, 139 Ga. 509, 77 S.E. 579 (1913).

Effect of local Act. - Under Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. IV, Para. I (no comparable provision in Ga. Const. 1983), the legislature may fix the compensation of county treasurers, and if such a local Act is passed, it is paramount to this section that the treasurer is paid according to the terms of the Act instead of the terms of this section. Phillips v. Hanks, 154 Ga. 244, 113 S.E. 806 (1922).

For constitutionality of local Act fixing compensation of county treasurer, see Moore v. Houston County, 124 Ga. 898, 53 S.E. 506 (1906).

Cited in Hicks v. Bibb County, 44 Ga. App. 538, 162 S.E. 157 (1932); Richmond County v. Pierce, 234 Ga. 274, 215 S.E.2d 665 (1975).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 177, 195, 205, 206.

36-6-13. Receipt of commission or fees in connection with certain road contracts; collection and disbursement of road contract funds.

Statute text

No county treasurer or other county official shall receive any commission on funds received or disbursed in connection with county contracts with the Department of Transportation for the construction or repair of roads; and this Code section and Code Sections 36-6-12 and 36-6-15 shall not apply to funds received or disbursed on such contracts. The funds received from county contracts with the Department of Transportation for the construction and repair of roads shall be collected by the county treasurer, in those counties having a county treasurer, and shall be disbursed by him without any commission or fee; in those counties having no county treasurer, the funds from these contracts shall be collected and disbursed by the usual officers without any commission or fee.

History

(Ga. L. 1939, p. 277, §§ 1, 2.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Authority of county to contract for public road purposes generally, § 32-4-60 et seq.

36-6-14. Duties generally.

Statute text

It is the duty of the county treasurer:

(1) To collect diligently from all officers and others all moneys due the county;

(2) To examine the minutes and execution dockets of the different courts of the county, to demand and receive all moneys appearing to be due thereon, and to institute proceedings against defaulters;

(3) To pay without delay, when there are sufficient funds, all orders or other debts due, according to their dates; when there are not sufficient funds, payment shall be made as prescribed in Code Section 36-11-4;

(4) To take a receipt on each order when paid and carefully file it away;

(5) To keep a well-bound book in which shall be entered all receipts, stating when received, from whom, and on what account, and all amounts paid out, stating when paid, to whom, and on what account;

(6) To keep a well-bound book in which shall be entered a full description of all county orders or other forms of indebtedness, as they are presented;

(7) To record a copy of the orders of the county governing authority levying county taxes;

(8) To exhibit to the first grand jury at the first session of the superior court of each year a full statement of the condition of the county treasury up to that time;

(9) On the second Monday in January of each year, to file with the county governing authority a full statement of his account, accompanied by his vouchers for the preceding year, together with his estimate of the indebtedness of the county for the ensuing year and the means of providing therefor;

(10) To place his books and vouchers before the grand jury or the county governing authority for examination when called upon to do so;

(11) To appear before the county governing authority or the grand jury to render an account of his actings and doings as county treasurer; and

(12) To publish at the door of the courthouse and in a public newspaper, if there is one published in the county, a copy of his annual statement to the county governing authority.

History

(Ga. L. 1859, p. 25, § 1; Code 1863, § 527; Code 1858, § 591; Code 1873, § 553; Code 1882, § 553; Civil Code 1895, § 460; Civil Code 1910, § 576; Code 1933, § 23-1015; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Publication not connected with probate court proceedings. - Publication of the statement required to be made under this section was neither directly nor remotely connected with the business or any proceeding of the court of ordinary (now judge of the probate court). Howard v. Early County, 104 Ga. 669, 30 S.E. 880 (1898).

Power of ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to cite treasurer to appear. - Under former Code 1873, §§ 553, 563, 337 (see O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-14, 36-6-27, and 36-5-1(7) (since repealed)) the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) had jurisdiction to cite the county treasurer to appear before the ordinary for a settlement of the treasurer's accounts as well as to order that moneys in the treasurer's hands be paid out by the treasurer to the proper persons; and upon the treasurer's failure to pay, to issue an execution for such default. Smith v. Outlaw, 64 Ga. 677 (1880).

Upon refusal to pay, mandamus will lie against treasurer of county to compel payment of any part of salary when by law the salary is payable and after the salary has been demanded, although at the time of making demand no formal warrant had issued therefor. Clark v. Eve, 134 Ga. 788, 68 S.E. 598 (1910).

Use of record in evidence. - When a county treasurer failed to comply with the requirements of former Code 1882, §§ 508 and 553 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-14 and 36-11-5), and when an execution was issued by the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) against the treasurer as a defaulter, the treasurer could not take advantage of the treasurer's own negligence so as to substitute evidence of a lower character for the record which it was incumbent upon the treasurer to make out and deposit. Price v. Douglas County, 77 Ga. 163, 3 S.E. 240 (1887).

When bank acts as county treasurer. - Bank acting as county depository becomes a quasi-public officer. It is therefore the duty of such bank, acting as county treasurer, to receive the surplus of the fine and forfeiture fund, and hold the funds for distribution as required by law. Banks County v. Stark, 88 Ga. App. 368, 77 S.E.2d 33 (1953).

Fund raised by private donation not county fund. - Fund raised by private donation, for courthouse, handled by ordinary (now judge of the probate court) and not paid into treasurer, was not a county fund in the sense used in former Civil Code 1895, §§ 458 and 460 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-14 and 36-6-15), and not demandable by the treasurer. Worth County v. Sykes, 2 Ga. App. 175, 58 S.E. 380 (1907).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 195, 205, 206.

36-6-15. Collection and disbursal of funds generally.

Statute text

All county funds are to be paid to and disbursed by the county treasurer except such as may be specially excepted by law, which shall be collected and disbursed as specially directed.

History

(Laws 1825, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 211; Code 1863, § 525; Code 1868, § 589; Code 1873, § 551; Code 1882, § 551; Civil Code 1895, § 458; Civil Code 1910, § 574; Code 1933, § 23-1016.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

When bank is county treasurer. - Bank acting as county depository becomes a quasi-public officer. It is therefore the duty of such bank, acting as county treasurer, to receive the surplus of the fine and forfeiture fund, and hold the funds for distribution as required by law. Banks County v. Stark, 88 Ga. App. 368, 77 S.E.2d 33 (1953).

Liability for failure to disburse money illegally borrowed. - Where the authorities in charge of the finances borrowed money for county purposes without authority of law, and the money thus unlawfully borrowed was received by the county treasurer as county funds, the county treasurer is liable for failure to disburse the money. Mason v. Commissioners of Rds. & Revenues, 104 Ga. 35, 30 S.E. 513 (1898).

Money borrowed to meet expenses not county funds within meaning of section. Hall v. County of Greene, 119 Ga. 253, 46 S.E. 69 (1903).

Fund raised by private donation not county fund. - Fund raised by private donation, for courthouse, handled by ordinary (now judge of the probate court) and not paid into treasurer, was not a county fund in sense used in former Civil Code 1895, §§ 458 and 460 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-14 and 36-6-15), and not demandable by the treasurer. Worth County v. Sykes, 2 Ga. App. 175, 58 S.E. 380 (1907).

Proceeds of county bonds. - Ordinary (now judge of the probate court) who receives the proceeds of county bonds may be compelled by mandamus to turn the funds over to the county treasurer. Aaron v. German, 114 Ga. 587, 40 S.E. 713 (1902).

How affected by contract. - In view of former Civil Code 1895, §§ 458 and 460 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-14 and 36-6-15), mandamus was not granted a county treasurer against county commissioners to compel delivery to the treasurer of balance of purchase price of bonds sold by them to a bank, under contract that proceeds should be left on deposit. Smith v. Hodgson, 129 Ga. 494, 59 S.E. 272 (1907).

Cited in Cureton v. Wheeler, 172 Ga. 879, 159 S.E. 283 (1931); Hancock County v. Hancock Nat'l Bank, 67 F.2d 421 (5th Cir. 1933); Harrison v. May, 228 Ga. 684, 187 S.E.2d 673 (1972).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Assumption of duties by another. - It would not be proper for anyone to assume the duties of the treasurer nor would it be proper for the treasurer to attempt to delegate the treasurer's responsibilities and duties to some other officer or other person. 1965-66 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 65-94.

Purchase of right of way. - Laws of this state do not authorize the setting aside of moneys in a "special fund" to purchase a right of way for county roads. 1969 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 69-231.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 195, 319, 320.

36-6-16. Deposits of county funds in designated depositories.

Statute text

The treasurers of the several counties are authorized to deposit the county funds which may come into their hands as county treasurers in any bank or banking institution which has been designated by law as a depository for the funds of the state.

History

(Ga. L. 1917, p. 199, § 1; Code 1933, § 23-1017.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article considering the public official's potential liability for funds, losses and torts, and suggesting insurance coverage, see 11 Mercer L. Rev. 288 (1960).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Requirements of section not absolute. - None of these provisions, Ga. L. 1917, p. 199, §§ 1, 2, and Ga. L. 1924, p. 86, §§ 1, 2 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-1-8, 36-6-16 and 36-6-17), make the statutory requirements absolute. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

It must be observed that neither Ga. L. 1917, p. 199, § 1 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-16) nor Ga. L. 1924, p. 86, §§ 1, 2 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-1-8) make the statutory requirements absolute; county treasurers may follow the provisions of either of these statutes, and thereby become absolutely safe from loss, as well as making safe the public funds with which they are entrusted; however, it appears the treasurer may keep the funds in the treasurer's possession so long as the treasurer is prepared to pay the funds out when lawfully authorized and required so to do. Allen v. Henderson, 48 Ga. App. 74, 172 S.E. 94 (1933).

Right to receive deposit not conditional upon giving bond. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1018 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-17) did not purport to condition the right to receive the deposit upon the giving of a bond but fixed a duty on the depository which has undertaken so to act to give a bond to the treasurer sufficient to protect the treasurer officially from any loss. Hancock County v. Hancock Nat'l Bank, 67 F.2d 421 (5th Cir. 1933).

Fact of deposit is not default. - County treasurers in Georgia very generally deposit the treasurers' public funds in a bank as a convenient and safe method of handling. Such deposits have never been considered as amounting to a default. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Treasurer liable if unable to produce funds. - Notwithstanding such deposits, the treasurer and the treasurer's bondsmen are liable, if the funds are not forthcoming when officially required. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Cited in Hancock County v. Hancock Nat'l Bank, 67 F.2d 421 (5th Cir. 1933); American Sur. Co. v. City of Thomasville, 73 F.2d 584 (5th Cir. 1934); Austin-Western Rd. Mach. Co. v. Fayette County, 99 F.2d 565 (5th Cir. 1938).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 7 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 195, 205, 206. 26B C.J.S., Depositaries, § 40 et seq.

36-6-16.1. Deposit of funds held for benefit of third persons by officer of county or court in treasury of counties having population of 600,000 or more.

Statute text

(a) It shall be lawful in all counties of this state having a population of 600,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census for any county officer and any officer of any court, including the superior court in such counties, having in his possession and custody any funds, including trust funds, held for the benefit of any third person or litigant or for any purpose or subject to the order of any court or other tribunal to deposit such funds for safekeeping in the treasury of the county and to accept therefor the receipt of the treasurer or other fiscal officer of such county.

(b) The original custodian of such fund before making any deposit may require the treasurer or other fiscal officer to execute in his favor a special bond in an amount not less than the aggregate of all funds so deposited and held by the treasurer or other fiscal officer, which bond with security approved by the superior court of such county shall be conditioned to repay or disburse all of such funds under proper legal authority. In lieu of other security on such bond, the treasurer or other fiscal officer may deposit in a safe place a bond of the United States Treasury in an amount not less than the aggregate of all deposits secured by such bond.

(c) The treasurer of any county or other fiscal officer charged with the custody of county funds may decline to accept funds from any officer or officer of the court for deposit and safekeeping when in the judgment of such treasurer or other fiscal officer the conditions imposed are burdensome or would cause hardship or financial loss.

(d) Any officer or officer of the court who deposits funds in his custody in the treasury of the county of such officer or officer of the court shall be relieved of personal responsibility for the safekeeping of such funds as may be entrusted to the treasury of the county under this Code section.

(e) This Code section shall not be interpreted to prevent or delay the direct payment into the county treasury of all funds belonging to such county and collected by or held by an officer or officer of the court, but all of same shall be deposited immediately in the county treasury without the requirement of any special bond.

History

(Ga. L. 1963, p. 2180, §§ 1-5; Code 1981, § 36-6-16.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1982, p. 2107, § 32; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2350, § 1.)

36-6-17. Furnishing of bonds by depositories selected by treasurer.

Statute text

Any depository of state funds selected by the county treasurer to be a depository of the county funds shall, in addition to the bond given to the state as security for the money of the state deposited in such bank, give to the county treasurer a bond in an amount sufficient to protect him from any loss, which bond shall be payable to him and shall be conditioned to account fully to him for all county moneys that may be deposited by him as county treasurer under the terms of this article.

History

(Ga. L. 1917, p. 199, § 2; Code 1933, § 23-1018.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Requirements of section not absolute. - None of these provisions, Ga. L. 1917, p. 199, §§ 1, 2 and Ga. L. 1924, p. 86, §§ 1, 2 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-1-8, 36-6-16, and 36-6-17), make the statutory requirements absolute. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Right to receive deposit not conditional upon giving bond. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1018 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-17) did not purport to condition the right to receive the deposit upon the giving of a bond but fixed a duty on the depository which has undertaken so to act to give a bond to the treasurer sufficient to protect the treasurer officially from any loss. Hancock County v. Hancock Nat'l Bank, 67 F.2d 421 (5th Cir. 1933).

Treasurer does not make deposit at the treasurer's own risk and does not take bond for the treasurer's personal benefit, but the treasurer acts throughout for the county and in the treasurer's official capacity, and the bond is to be payable to the treasurer as treasurer and is to prevent loss to the treasury. Hancock County v. Hancock Nat'l Bank, 67 F.2d 421 (5th Cir. 1933).

Treasurer liable if unable to produce funds. - Notwithstanding such deposits, the treasurer and the treasurer's bondsmen are liable if the funds are not forthcoming when officially required. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Fact of deposit not default. - County treasurers in Georgia very generally deposit the treasurers' public funds in a bank as a convenient and safe method of handling. Such deposits have never been considered as amounting to a default. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

Security company has duty to investigate. - When a security company agrees to execute a surety bond of a public officer, the company has the opportunity and should avail itself of every means of ascertaining exactly what position that officer occupies with respect to public funds for which the company assumes liability. Century Indem. Co. v. Fidelity & Deposit Co., 175 Ga. 834, 166 S.E. 235 (1932).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 15 et seq.

C.J.S. - 26B C.J.S., Depositaries, § 67.

36-6-18. Arrangements for payment of interest on deposits; disposition of interest payments.

Statute text

The county treasurers are authorized to arrange with the bank to pay interest on the money deposited with the bank, but they are not required to do so. Any money received by them as interest must be paid by them into the treasury of the county.

History

(Ga. L. 1917, p. 199, § 3; Code 1933, § 23-1019.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Hancock County v. Hancock Nat'l Bank, 67 F.2d 421 (5th Cir. 1933); Austin-Western Rd. Mach. Co. v. Fayette County, 99 F.2d 565 (5th Cir. 1938).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Funds, § 11.

C.J.S. - 26B C.J.S., Depositaries, § 101.

36-6-19. Disposition of books of treasurer when full.

Statute text

When the books of the county treasurer are full, they must be deposited, together with the vouchers and other files relating thereto, in the office of the county governing authority and shall be part of its records.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 529; Code 1868, § 593; Code 1873, § 555; Code 1882, § 555; Civil Code 1895, § 462; Civil Code 1910, § 578; Code 1933, § 23-1021.)

36-6-20. Delivery of money, books, papers, and property to successor.

Statute text

Upon the resignation, expiration of the term, or removal from office of the county treasurer, he, or, if he is dead, his personal representative, must state his accounts and deliver all the money, books, papers, and property of the county to his successor, as do other officers. His successor must report the same immediately to the county governing authority.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 541; Code 1868, § 605; Code 1873, § 564; Code 1882, § 564; Civil Code 1895, § 470; Civil Code 1910, § 586; Code 1933, § 23-1022.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Provisions of former Civil Code 1910, §§ 586 and 587 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-20 and 36-6-21) were not applicable to annual accounting and settlement made by the tax collector with the county commissioners. Read v. Glynn County, 145 Ga. 881, 90 S.E. 60 (1916).

36-6-21. Final settlement of accounts.

Statute text

When the county treasurer or his personal representative has made a fair and full statement of all his accounts and liabilities as such, pursuant to Code Section 36-6-20, an exoneration of himself and his sureties, together with the details of such settlement, must be entered on the minutes of the county governing authority. It shall be final, except for fraud.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 542; Code 1868, § 606; Code 1873, § 565; Code 1882, § 565; Civil Code 1895, § 471; Civil Code 1910, § 587; Code 1933, § 23-1023.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Provisions of former Civil Code 1910, §§ 586 and 587 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-20 and 36-6-21) were not applicable to annual accounting and settlement made by the tax collector with the county commissioners. Read v. Glynn County, 145 Ga. 881, 90 S.E. 60 (1916).

Cited in Board of Comm'rs v. Massachusetts Bonding Ins. Co., 175 Ga. 584, 165 S.E. 828 (1932).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 205, 206.

36-6-22. Requirement of accountings by treasurer.

Statute text

It shall be the duty of the judge of the probate court or county governing authority to compel the treasurers of the county to come before the court or governing authority at such times as may be designated by the judge or governing authority, not less than twice in each year, to render an account of his official actings and doings respecting the county tax and funds and to make a full and complete exhibit of his books, vouchers, accounts, and all things pertaining to his office.

History

(Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 82, § 1; Civil Code 1895, § 418; Civil Code 1910, § 527; Code 1933, § 23-1024; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 36.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Power of commissioners to require appearance. - Under former Civil Code 1910, §§ 527 and 528 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-22 and 36-6-23), the board of commissioners of roads and revenues has authority to require the tax collector to appear before the board at stated times to render an account of the collector's official actings. Edmondson v. Glenn, 153 Ga. 401, 112 S.E. 366 (1922).

In a proceeding under former Civil Code 1910, § 527 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-22) or former Civil Code 1910, § 528 (see now O.C.G.A. § 48-5-140), the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) acted in a judicial or quasi-judicial capacity. Riner v. Flanders, 173 Ga. 43, 159 S.E. 693 (1931).

36-6-23. Proceedings upon failure of treasurer to render accounting.

Statute text

The failure or refusal of any county treasurer to render the account and make the showing provided for by Code Section 36-6-22, after being notified to do so by the county governing authority, shall constitute malpractice in office. A conviction therefor shall subject the offender to removal from office. During the continuance of such failure or refusal after the notice aforesaid, the county governing authority shall suspend the treasurer from duty and shall appoint some fit and proper person to take charge of the county funds and perform the duties of his office until the question of his removal can be passed upon and decided by the proper tribunal. Proper bonds shall be taken from the person so appointed, as provided by law. The power given by this Code section and Code Section 36-6-22 to inquire into the affairs of the treasurer of the county and to suspend him from office in certain cases shall in no way affect the liability of the treasurer or that of the sureties on his bond.

History

(Ga. L. 1882-83, p. 82, § 2; Civil Code 1895, § 419; Civil Code 1910, § 528; Code 1933, § 23-1025.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Pitts Banking Co. v. Sherman, 166 Ga. 495, 143 S.E. 581 (1928).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, §§ 198, 199.

36-6-24. Removal of treasurer.

Statute text

County treasurers may be removed from office in the same manner as clerks of the superior courts may be removed.

History

(Laws 1821, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 211; Laws 1838, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 215; Code 1863, § 518; Code 1868, § 582; Code 1873, § 544; Code 1882, § 544; Civil Code 1895, § 450; Civil Code 1910, § 566; Code 1933, § 23-1026.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Removal of clerks of superior courts, § 15-6-82.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Finding of incapacity and removal. - Judge of the superior court can remove the current county treasurer from office after a jury finding of incapacity, pursuant to O.C.G.A. §§ 15-6-82 and 36-6-24. 1985 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U85-30.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, § 165 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 168 et seq. 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 227 et seq.

36-6-25. Filling of vacancies.

Statute text

Vacancies in the office of county treasurer shall be filled as are vacancies in other county offices.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 519; Code 1868, § 583; Code 1873, § 545; Code 1882, § 545; Civil Code 1895, § 451; Civil Code 1910, § 567; Code 1933, § 23-1027.)

Annotations

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

How construed. - Language "vacancies are filled as vacancies in other county offices" should be construed to mean how a majority of vacancies in county offices are filled and, of course, this leads to the provisions provided for the filling of vacancies in the office of clerk of the superior court. 1957 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 58.

Hold-over prevents a vacancy. 1957 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 58.

Procedure in event of incapacity of county treasurer. - There appears to be no Code provision authorizing the appointment of an "acting" county treasurer to serve in place of the elected treasurer until an incapacity of the current official ends. 1985 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U85-30.

Judge of the probate court can appoint a qualified person to carry out the duties of county treasurer if an incapacity has been established. If the vacancy was to last more than six months (and prior to the time for the regular election of the county treasurer), the probate court then would have to call for a special election to fill the unexpired term of the former county treasurer, pursuant to former O.C.G.A. §§ 15-6-54(b) and 15-6-56. 1985 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U85-30.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Officers and Employees, §§ 88, 105 et seq.

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 163. 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, § 161 et seq.

36-6-26. Bonds of persons appointed to fill vacancies.

Statute text

The amount of the bonds of appointees to fill vacancies shall be in the discretion of the county governing authority, taking into consideration the amount that may come into their hands, and shall be for double such amount.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, § 524; Code 1868, § 588; Code 1873, § 550; Code 1882, § 550; Civil Code 1895, § 457; Civil Code 1910, § 573; Code 1933, § 23-1028.)

Annotations

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 160. 67 C.J.S., Officers and Public Employees, §§ 73, 74.

36-6-27. Execution against county treasurer for failure to pay over money.

Statute text

When the county treasurer at any time fails to pay any order which is entitled to payment, any other legal demand upon him, or any balance that is in his hands to his successor or to the person entitled to receive it, the county governing authority may issue execution against him and his sureties for the amount due, as against a defaulting tax collector.

History

(Laws 1825, Cobb's 1851 Digest, p. 212; Code 1863, § 540; Code 1868, § 604; Code 1873, § 563; Code 1882, § 563; Civil Code 1895, § 469; Civil Code 1910, § 585; Code 1933, § 23-1611.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Inclusion of attorney's fees unconstitutional. - Former Code 1933, § 23-1611 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-27), insofar as the statute authorized a board of commissioners to include in an execution attorney's fees under former Code 1933, § 91A-3183 (see now O.C.G.A. § 48-5-201), was unconstitutional and void because it was violative of U.S. Const., amend. 14, and Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. III (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. I), in that no provision was made giving the county treasurer and the sureties on the treasurer's bond an opportunity to be heard as to the amount or reasonableness of such fees, and the law does not otherwise provide for any method of attack thereon. Former Code 1933, § 23-1611 was further unconstitutional and void because in violation of Ga. Const. 1877, Art. I, Sec. I, Para. I and Art. I, Sec. I, Para. XXIII (see now Ga. Const. 1983, Art. I, Sec. II, Paras. I and III), the determination of what attorney's fees incurred were reasonable and the assessment of such fees were judicial functions and could not be delegated to an administrative official. Massachusetts Bonding & Ins. Co. v. Floyd County, 178 Ga. 595, 173 S.E. 720 (1934).

Relation to other sections. - Provisions of former Civil Code 1910, § 1187 (see now O.C.G.A. § 48-5-201), relating to issuance of executions against defaulting county tax collectors and their bondsmen, were by former Civil Code 1910, § 585 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-6-27) made applicable to the issuance of executions against defaulting county treasurers and their bondsmen. Massachusetts Bonding & Ins. Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 172 Ga. 409, 157 S.E. 459 (1931).

Liability of official charged with custody of public funds greater than that of mere bailee. Lamb v. Dart, 108 Ga. 602, 34 S.E. 160 (1899).

Power of ordinary (now judge of the probate court) to cite treasurer to appear for settlement of accounts. - Under former Code 1873, §§ 337, 553 and 563 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-14, 36-6-27 and 36-5-1 (since repealed)), the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) had jurisdiction to cite the county treasurer to appear before the ordinary for a settlement of the treasurer's accounts, as well as to order moneys in the treasurer's hands to be paid out by the treasurer to the proper persons, and upon the treasurer's failure to issue execution for such default. Smith v. Outlaw, 64 Ga. 677 (1880).

Power to issue execution against defaulting county treasurer was vested in the ordinary (now judge of the probate court), or in county commissioners if the fiscal affairs of the county were administered by the commissioners. Arthur v. Commissioners of Gordon County, 67 Ga. 220 (1881); Roberts v. Dancer, 144 Ga. 341, 87 S.E. 287 (1915).

Execution authorized against absconding treasurer. - Ordinary (now judge of the probate court) is authorized to issue execution against an absconding county treasurer for money in the treasurer's hands. Jones v. Collier, 65 Ga. 553 (1880).

Execution to be issued in name of county. - Execution provided by this section against a defaulting county treasurer should be issued in the name of the county; but if issued in the name of the ordinary (now judge of the probate court) for the use of the county, such irregularity is an amendable defect, and does not render the process void. Roberts v. Dancer, 144 Ga. 341, 87 S.E. 287 (1915).

Notice in writing not required. - It is not necessary that notice in writing be given before the issuing of the execution provided in this section. Price v. Douglas County, 77 Ga. 163, 3 S.E. 240 (1887); Roberts v. Dancer, 144 Ga. 341, 87 S.E. 287 (1915).

Execution is issued summarily, and defendant then has the right to test questions involved by trial by jury. A defendant who has had a full and complete trial after the issuance of execution has no cause to complain that the defendant did not have it before. Arthur v. Commissioners of Gordon County, 67 Ga. 220 (1881).

Liability of treasurer on bank's insolvency. - When a county treasurer, in making an accounting with the treasurer's successor, delivers a check representing public funds which the treasurer has in a bank, and the same is accepted in lieu of cash, and upon the acceptance and presentation of such check by the payee, credit therefor is transferred by the bank to the new treasurer, and the fact that the bank may be insolvent at the time of such transaction does not necessarily show a default by the officer making such accounting. In equity the transaction should be treated as a transfer of money to the extent of the amount which the bank could and would have paid in cash, if cash had been demanded. Board of Comm'rs v. Massachusetts Bonding & Ins. Co., 175 Ga. 584, 165 S.E. 828 (1932).

Arrest of execution. - Execution by a county against the treasurer and the treasurer's surety must be construed to have been issued under this section; and having been so issued, the execution cannot be arrested by affidavit of illegality. Board of Comm'rs v. Massachusetts Bonding & Ins. Co., 175 Ga. 584, 165 S.E. 828 (1932).

Remedy by affidavit of illegality not applicable to treasurers. - By Ga. L. 1915, §§ 1-3 (see now O.C.G.A. § 48-5-203), the law in relation to issuance of executions against county tax collectors was so amended as to afford a remedy by affidavit of illegality, but that Act did not extend so far as to afford such remedy to county treasurers and the treasurers' bondsmen. Massachusetts Bonding & Ins. Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 172 Ga. 409, 157 S.E. 459 (1931).

Interest. - In proceeding under this section, the county, having collected and used money which actually belonged to the plaintiff, is chargeable with interest the same as any other person would have been. United States Fid. & Guar. Co. v. Clarke, 190 Ga. 46, 8 S.E.2d 52 (1940).

Interest charged against both principal and surety. - Former Civil Code 1910, §§ 585 and 1187 (see now O.C.G.A. §§ 36-6-27 and 48-5-201) drew no distinction between the principal and surety in regard to payment of interest, but the interest specified in the statute was to be charged against both the principal and surety. Massachusetts Bonding & Ins. Co. v. Board of Comm'rs, 172 Ga. 409, 157 S.E. 459 (1931).

36-6-28. Purchase of county orders at less than full value or refusal to pay order.

Statute text

Any county treasurer who buys up any county orders or claims for less than their full par value, either by himself or by agents, directly or indirectly, pays for them in property at an estimated value above its true value, refuses to pay an order when he has funds to pay the same, or illegally postpones the payment of an order shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be removed from office on complaint and proof being made to the county governing authority.

History

(Orig. Code 1863, §§ 535, 536; Code 1868, §§ 599, 600; Code 1873, §§ 561, 562; Code 1882, §§ 561, 562; Civil Code 1895, § 468; Penal Code 1895, § 276; Civil Code 1910, § 584; Penal Code 1910, § 280; Code 1933, §§ 23-1609, 23-9902.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Defect in title no defense. - Fact that the person from whom the treasurer bought the orders did not have good title is not a defense. Wilder v. State, 47 Ga. 522 (1873).

Treasurer may purchase warrants. - County orders or warrants may be sold, and the county treasurer personally is permitted to purchase a warrant, provided the treasurer pays full value therefor. Southern Ry. v. Fulton County, 170 Ga. 248, 152 S.E. 567 (1930).

Accessory parties. - As this section provides for a misdemeanor, and there are no accessories in misdemeanors, all who knowingly participate in the criminal act, and all who procure, counsel, command, aid, or abet the commission of a misdemeanor are regarded by the law as the principal offenders, and may be indicted as such. Blalock v. State, 40 Ga. App. 242, 149 S.E. 297 (1929).

Indictment. - To authorize a conviction under this section, it is necessary for the indictment to allege that the accused is a county treasurer or acts in an official capacity equal to a county treasurer if a county has no such office. Blalock v. State, 40 Ga. App. 242, 149 S.E. 297 (1929).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 20 C.J.S., Counties, § 123.

——————————

CHAPTER 7

COUNTY SURVEYOR

Sec.

36-7-1. Requirement of county surveyor for each county; appointment of assistants or deputies.

36-7-2. Election, commissioning, qualification, and removal of county surveyor; qualifications.

36-7-2.1. Abolishing elected office and authorizing appointment; qualifications of appointed surveyor.

36-7-3. Procedure when election fails to fill office; procedure in event of vacancy.

36-7-4. Commissioning of surveyor.

36-7-5. Oath of office; bond and security.

36-7-6. Oath of assistant; entry of appointment of assistant on minutes of probate court.

36-7-7. Place of office.

36-7-8. Duties of surveyor generally.

36-7-9. Establishment of fees.

36-7-10. Payment of fees generally.

36-7-11. Issuance of execution for fees.

36-7-12. Surveys or plats deemed presumptive evidence of facts.
